Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 504B.161, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. (a) In every lease or license of residential premises, the landlord or licensor covenants: (1) that the premises and all common areas are fit for the use intended by the parties; (2) to keep the premises and all common areas in reasonable repair during the term of the lease or license, including services and conditions listed in section 504B.381, subdivision 1, and extermination of insects, rodents, vermin, or other pests on the premises, except when the disrepair has been caused by the willful, malicious, or irresponsible conduct of the tenant or licensee or a person under the direction or control of the tenant or licensee; (3) to make the premises and all common areas reasonably energy efficient by installing weatherstripping, caulking, storm windows, and storm doors when any such measure will result in energy procurement cost savings, based on current and projected average residential energy costs in Minnesota, that will exceed the cost of implementing that measure, including interest, amortized over the ten-year period following the incurring of the cost; (4) to maintain the premises and all common areas in compliance with the applicable health and safety laws of the United States, of the state, and of the local units of government, including ordinances regulating rental licensing, where the premises are located during the term of the lease or license, except when violation of the health and safety laws has been caused by the willful, malicious, or irresponsible conduct of the tenant or licensee or a person under the direction or control of the tenant or licensee; and (5) to equip or furnish heat at a minimum temperature of 68 degrees Fahrenheit in all places intended for habitation including kitchens and bathrooms from October 1 through April 30, unless a utility company requires and instructs the heat to be reduced.new text begin This clause does not apply to garages, crawl spaces, porches, or other areas of a residential unit that are not designed for continuous human habitation.new text end (b) The parties to a lease or license of residential premises may not waive or modify the covenants imposed by this section.